Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-119
Department; assist in acquisition, development, operation, or maintenance of airports.

The department may render assistance in the acquisition, development, operation, or maintenance of privately owned public use airports or airports owned, controlled, or operated or to be owned, controlled, or operated by municipalities in this state out of appropriations made by the Legislature for that purpose.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(13), p. 87;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 6.